District of Columbia statutes.
7-1721.06

Prohibited sellers.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, no cigarette or other tobacco product shall be sold to individual customers from mobile vending motor vehicles and trailers that sell retail food products ready for immediate consumption.

(b)

Cigarettes may be sold at hotdog stands and construction site food wagons by vendors who are licensed pursuant to § 47-2404.

(c)

No single cigar containing reconstituted tobacco products shall be sold to individual customers at convenience stores and gas stations.

(d)

Any person who violates subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than $500 nor less than $100, imprisoned not more than 30 days, or both, for the first offense. Any person convicted of a subsequent violation of subsection (a) of this section shall be fined not more than $1,000 nor less than $500, imprisoned not more than 90 days, or both.

History

Feb. 7, 1891, 26 Stat. 736, ch. 117, § 7
as added July 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-189, § 3(d), 57 DCR 3019

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-1703.04 and § 7-1721.07.